Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
431R]

PRESCRIPTION
DRUG BENEFITS

Section

431R-1 Definitions

431R-2 Retail community pharmacies; retail
pharmacy network;

contractual agreements

431R-3 Prescription drugs; beneficiary choice;
mail order

opt out

431R-4 Report to insurance commissioner

431R-5 Violations; penalties

431R-6 Application

431R-7 Rules

Cross References

Pharmacy benefit managers, prohibited marketing practices
regarding health information, see §487J-7.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next